Hawaii statutes.
[§481R-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Commissioner" means the
insurance commissioner.

"Consumer" means a person in this
State who purchases or otherwise possesses a vehicle protection product.

"Department" means the
department of commerce and consumer affairs.

"Reimbursement insurance policy"
means a policy of insurance issued to a warrantor to:

(1) Provide reimbursement to the warrantor under the
terms of the insured vehicle protection product issued or sold by the
warrantor; and

(2) Pay on behalf of the warrantor, in the event of
the warrantor's nonperformance, all covered obligations incurred by the
warrantor under the terms of the insured vehicle protection product issued or
sold by the warrantor.

"Seller" means a person engaged in the
business of offering a vehicle protection product for sale to a consumer.

"Vehicle identification number" means
a serial number or identification mark of any vehicle established by the
manufacturer for the purpose of identifying the vehicle.

"Vehicle protection product" means a
product or system, which includes a written warranty, that is:

(1) Installed or applied to a vehicle; and

(2) Designed to prevent loss or damage to a vehicle
from a specific cause.

"Warrantor" means a person named
under the terms of a vehicle protection product warranty as the contractual
obligor to the consumer. [L 2002, c 237, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next